District of Columbia statutes.
3-1205.08

Issuance of license, registration, or certification.

Each board shall issue a license, registration, or certification to an applicant who meets the requirements of this chapter and rules and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter to practice the health occupation regulated by the board.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 508, 33 DCR 729
July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(e)(8), 56 DCR 4043
1981 Ed., § 2-3305.8.
D.C. Law 18-26, in the section heading, inserted “, registration, or certification”; and substituted “license, registration, or certification”, for “license”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e)(8) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).